District of Columbia statutes.
1-611.51

Establishment of the Mayor and Council Compensation Advisory Commission.

The Mayor and Council Compensation Advisory Commission (“Commission”) is established to determine the proper compensation of elected officials in the District of Columbia.

Mar 3, 1979, D.C. Law 2-139, § 1151
as added Mar. 14, 2007, D.C. Law 16-295, § 2(b), 54 DCR 1092

History

Section 7087 of D.C. Law 17-219 repealed section 3 of D.C. Law 16-295.

Editor's Notes